District of Columbia statutes.
20-105

Devolution of property at death.

Except as provided in section 20-357 , all property of a decedent shall be subject to this title and, upon the decedent’s death, shall pass directly to the personal representative, who shall hold the legal title for administration and distribution of the estate.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-105.